District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-701

District of Columbia Leasing Fees Working Fund.

Repealed.

July 1, 1954, 68 Stat. 393, ch. 449, § 5
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 238, Pub. L. 86-104, § 15
Apr. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 30, Pub. L. 86-412, § 15
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1031, 52 DCR 7503
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, §§ 1002, 1012, 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9019, 58 DCR 6226
1981 Ed., § 9-301.
1973 Ed., § 9-501.
Section 102 of D.C. Law 18-222 substituted “Fund; provided, that the income received from the lease of the Washington Center for Aging Service building and property, located at 2601 18th Street, N.E., shall be deposited in, and credited to the unrestricted fund balance of, the General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “Fund”.
Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1031 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1002 and 1012 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Short title of subtitle G of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1030 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle G of title I of the act may be cited as the Leasing Fees Working Fund Amendment Act of 2005.

Short title: Section 1001 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle A of title I of the act may be cited as the “Lease Income from Former School Buildings Authorization Amendment Act of 2010”.

Short title: Section 1011 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle B of title I of the act may be cited as the “Washington Center for Aging Services Lease Income Amendment Act of 2010”.

The Department of Buildings and Grounds was replaced by the Department of General Services by Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969.

The functions of the Department of General Services were transferred, in part, to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984, and transferred, in part, to the Department of Administrative Services by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.